vi: Lớp phủ/hoàn thiện lưỡi: Acid stonewash; Phun cát; Oxit đen; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Đánh bóng; Satin; Mài đá (Stonewash); Xóc bóng; Khác
ja: 刃の仕上げ／コーティング: アシッドストーンウォッシュ; ビーズブラスト; ブラックオキサイド; セラコート; DLC; PVD; ポリッシュ; サテン; ストーンウォッシュ; タンブル; その他
es: Acabado o recubrimiento de la hoja: Lavado a la piedra al ácido; Granallado; Óxido negro; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Pulido; Satinado; Lavado a la piedra; Tamboreado; Otro
sv: Skenyta/beläggning: Syratumlad; Glasblästrad; Svartoxiderad; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Polerad; Satin; Stonewash; Tumlad; Övrigt
th: ผิว/การเคลือบใบมีด: แอซิดสโตนวอช; บีดบลาสต์; แบล็กออกไซด์; เซราโคท; DLC; PVD; ขัดเงา; ซาติน; สโตนวอช; ทัมเบิล; อื่นๆ
pl: Wykończenie/powłoka ostrza: Wytrawiane (acid stonewash); Szkiełkowane; Oksydowane na czarno; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Polerowane; Satynowane; Stonewash; Bębnowane; Inne
nb: Bladfinish/belegg: Acid stonewash; Glassblåst; Svart oksid; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Polert; Sateng; Stonewash; Tromlet; Annet
sl-SI: Končna obdelava/premaz rezila: Acid stonewash; Peskano s kroglicami; Črni oksid; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Polirano; Satinirano; Stonewash; Bobnano; Drugo
zh-CN: 刀刃抛光/涂层: 酸洗石洗; 喷珠; 发黑处理; 陶瓷涂层 (Cerakote); 类金刚石碳 (DLC); 物理气相沉积 (PVD); 抛光; 缎面; 石洗; 滚磨抛光; 其他
pt-PT: Acabamento/revestimento da lâmina: Lavagem com ácido e pedras; Jato de esferas; Óxido preto; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Polido; Acetinado; Lavagem com pedras; Tumbled; Outros
fi: Terän viimeistely/pinnoite: Happopesu (acid stonewash); Lasikuulapuhallettu; Mustaoksidointi; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Kiillotettu; Satiini; Kivipesty; Rummutettu; Muu
it: Finitura/rivestimento della lama: Acid stonewash; Sabbiata; Ossido nero; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Lucidata; Satinata; Stonewash; Burattata; Altro
ko: 블레이드 마감/코팅: 애시드 스톤워시; 비드 블라스트; 흑색 산화물; 세라코트; DLC; PVD; 폴리싱; 새틴; 스톤워시; 텀블; 기타
hu: Penge felületkezelése/bevonata: Savas kőmosott; Gyöngyfúvott; Fekete oxiddal kezelt; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Polírozott; Szatén; Kőmosott; Koptatott; Egyéb
lt-LT: Ašmenų apdaila / danga: Plautas rūgštyje („Acid stonewash“); Apdorotas smėliasrove („Bead blasted“); Juodasis oksidas; „Cerakote“ danga; DLC danga; PVD danga; Poliruotas; Satininis; Plautas akmenimis („Stonewash“); Apdirbtas būgne („Tumbled“); Kita
hr-HR: Završna obrada / premaz oštrice: Acid stonewash; Pjeskareno; Crni oksid; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Polirano; Satinirano; Stonewash; Bubnjano (tumbled); Ostalo
zh-TW: 刀片表面處理/塗層: 酸洗石洗; 噴砂; 黑氧化; Cerakote 塗層; DLC; PVD; 拋光; 緞面; 石洗; 滾磨; 其他
fr: Finition / revêtement de la lame: Stonewash à l’acide; Microbillé; Oxyde noir; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Poli; Satiné; Stonewash; Tumbled; Autre
pt-BR: Acabamento/revestimento da lâmina: Stonewash ácido; Jateado; Óxido negro; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Polido; Acetinado; Stonewash; Tumbled; Outro
tr: Bıçak yüzeyi/kaplaması: Asitle eskitilmiş; Kumlama; Siyah oksit; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Cilalı; Saten; Taşlanmış; Tamburlanmış; Diğer
ro-RO: Finisaj/acoperire lamă: Acid stonewash; Sablaj fin; Oxid negru; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Lustruit; Satinat; Stonewash; Tumbled; Altele
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava/náter čepele: Acid stonewash; Pieskované; Čierny oxid; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Leštené; Saténové; Stonewash; Tromlované; Iné
bg-BG: Покритие на острието: Тъмно стоунуош покритие (Acid stonewash); Бластирано (Bead blasted); Черен оксид; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Полирано; Сатенирано; Стоунуош (Stonewash); Барабанно полирано (Tumbled); Други
cs: Povrchová úprava/povlak nože: Kyselinový stonewash; Pískované; Černý oxid; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Leštěné; Saténové; Stonewash; Bubnované; Jiné
da: Finish eller belægning på bladet: Acid stonewash; Glasblæst; Sort-oxideret; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Poleret; Satin; Stonewash; Tromlet; Andet
de: Oberflächenbeschaffenheit bzw. Beschichtung der Klinge: Acid Stonewash; Glasperlengestrahlt; Brüniert; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Poliert; Satiniert; Stonewash; Getrommelt; Sonstige
ru: Отделка/покрытие лезвия: Кислотное галтование (Acid Stonewash); Пескоструйная обработка (Bead blasted); Черное оксидирование; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Полированное; Сатинирование; Галтование (Stonewash); Галтованное (Tumbled); Другое
nl: Blad afwerking/coating: Acid stonewash; Geparelstraald; Zwart oxide; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Gepolijst; Satijn; Stonewash; Tumbled; Anders
en: Blade finish/coating: Acid stonewash; Bead blasted; Black oxide; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Polished; Satin; Stonewash; Tumbled; Other
el: Φινίρισμα/επίστρωση λεπίδας: Acid stonewash; Αμμοβολή (Bead blasted); Μαύρο οξείδιο; Cerakote; DLC; PVD; Γυαλισμένο; Σατινέ; Stonewash; Tumbled; Άλλο